Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5204XC (3) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 474.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. As used in this chapter and chapters 475A , 476 , 476A , 3 477A, 477B, 477C , 478 , 479 , 479A , and 479B , âcommissionâ and 4 âutilities commissionâ mean the Iowa utilities commission. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 477B.1 Video streaming services ââ 6 audio volume of commercials. 7 1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context 8 otherwise requires: 9 a. âConsumer-generated mediaâ means content, including 10 video, audio, and multimedia, created and made available by 11 consumers to internet sites or services on the internet. 12 b. âVideo programmingâ means programming by, or generally 13 considered comparable to programming provided by, a television 14 broadcast station. âVideo programmingâ does not include 15 consumer-generated media. 16 c. (1) âVideo streaming serviceâ means an entity that makes 17 available directly to the consumer, through a distribution 18 method that uses internet protocol, any of the following: 19 (a) Video programming. 20 (b) Video content. 21 (2) âVideo streaming serviceâ does not include a television 22 broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video 23 programming distributor, or an entity that provides video 24 programming or video content without commercial advertisements. 25 2. Advertisement volume. On and after July 1, 2026, a video 26 streaming service that serves a consumer residing in this state 27 shall not transmit to the consumer a commercial advertisement 28 at an audio volume louder than the audio volume of the video 29 programming or video content the advertisement accompanies. 30 3. Federal compliance. Subsection 2 shall be enforced 31 consistent with federal communications commission regulations 32 under the federal Commercial Advertisement Loudness Mitigation 33 Act, Pub. L. No. 111-311. 34 4. Enforcement ââ penalties. 35 -1- LSB 5204XC (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. _____ a. If the commission has reasonable belief that a video 1 streaming service is in violation of subsection 2, the 2 commission shall have the sole authority to bring a civil 3 action to provide for all of the following: 4 (1) Enjoin further violations by the video streaming 5 service. 6 (2) Enforce compliance with this chapter. 7 (3) Seek civil penalties in an amount of not more than 8 five hundred dollars for each violation of this section. For 9 purposes of this subsection, each day a violation of subsection 10 2 occurs shall be a separate violation. 11 b. If the commission notifies a video streaming service of 12 complaints in violation of this section, the video streaming 13 service may demonstrate compliance by doing any of the 14 following: 15 (1) Providing evidence of actual compliance with this 16 section. 17 (2) Providing evidence of ongoing compliance with the 18 most recently published recommended practices provided by the 19 advanced television systems committee. 20 5. Private right of action. This section shall not be 21 construed to create a private right of action. 22